Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 97 The Rhode Island Board of Education Act

16-97-1.
Rhode Island board of education established.

Effective January 1, 2013, there is created a board of education that shall be responsible for and shall exercise the purposes, powers, and duties of, this chapter and chapters 59 and 60 of this title. The board is responsible for the coordination of education from pre-k through higher education and shall set goals and policies for the effective coordination of these public education systems.

The board of education shall consist of seventeen (17) public members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, eight (8) of whom shall be designated to serve on the council on elementary and secondary education and eight (8) of whom shall be designated to serve on the council on postsecondary education. The chairperson of the board shall serve as a member of both councils. Six (6) of the members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of three (3) years; six (6) members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of two (2) years; and, four (4) members initially appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of one year. To the greatest extent possible, the initial staggered terms shall be equitably divided among the councils so as to protect against sudden changes in membership and reversal of policy. Thereafter, all members appointed pursuant to this section shall serve terms of three (3) years. At the expiration of their terms, members shall remain and continue in their official capacity until their successor is appointed and qualified. Members shall not be appointed to more than three (3), successive three-year (3) terms each; provided that the chair of the board shall have no term and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. Any vacancy among the members of the board shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. In the selection and appointment of the board, the governor shall seek persons who best serve the needs of the entire state. No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board after the effective date of this act unless a resident of this state. Members of the board shall not be compensated for their service in attending board or council meetings.

The chair of the Governor’s workforce board, or designee; the chair of the Rhode Island commerce corporation, or designee; and the chair of the university of Rhode Island board of trustees, or designee, shall serve as non-voting, ex-officio members of the board.

The governor shall select from the appointed members a chairperson and vice chairperson. A quorum shall consist of nine (9) members of the board. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, members of the board shall be removable by the governor for cause only. Removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to performance, capacity, or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

The statutory responsibilities of the department of elementary and secondary education, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and the commissioner of postsecondary education shall remain unchanged.

The chair of the board of education shall consult with the chairs of the council on elementary and secondary education, the council on postsecondary education, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, and the commissioner of postsecondary education in developing agendas, goals, policies, and strategic plans for the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 8; P.L. 2014, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 8.

16-97-1.1.
Purposes of the board of education.

The Rhode Island Board of Education shall be responsible for long-range planning and for coordinating and evaluating policies and programs for the public educational systems of the state. The general assembly finds and declares that the board of education shall have the following purposes:

To develop and adopt educational, financial and operational goals for the education systems of the state that represent achievable benchmarks for a ten-year (10) and twenty-year (20) time frame and that can be implemented by the council on elementary and secondary education, the council on postsecondary education, and the commissioners for elementary and secondary education and postsecondary education;

To ensure that the education systems of the state are aligned with the projected opportunities in workforce development and economic development and that the education systems are preparing students to participate in the future workforce of Rhode Island;

To coordinate programs and courses of study and promote collaboration between and among pre-kindergarten through higher education institutions and agencies, including, but not limited to:

Improving career and college readiness;

Reducing the need for remedial instruction;

Implementing and coordinating common core and other system wide standards;

Ensuring a quality system for adult education and certification programs in secondary school and college.

To present strategic budget and finance recommendations to the council on elementary and secondary education and council on postsecondary education that are aligned with the long-range goals adopted by the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 9.

16-97-1.2.
Powers and duties of the board of education.

The board of education shall have the following powers and duties:

To develop and adopt a strategic plan defining broad goals and objectives for education in the state. These goals and objectives shall be expressed in terms of the future educational attainment of the population, quality of life and economy of Rhode Island, including but not limited to what children, men and women should know and be able to do as a result of their educational experience and the contributions of education to meeting the workforce and economic development needs of Rhode Island. The board shall approve the strategic plans for elementary and secondary education and postsecondary education in terms of the alignment of these strategic plans with the overall strategic plan of the board of education. The board shall continuously evaluate the efforts of the council on elementary and secondary education and the council on postsecondary education to implement the strategic plans and shall review the results of education in the light of these objectives;

To prepare and maintain a five (5) year strategic funding plan for all levels of education in Rhode Island. The board shall determine priorities of expenditures for public education purposes of state revenues and other public resources made available for the support of public education and direct the council on elementary and secondary education and the council on postsecondary education to implement those priorities when developing the annual budget for elementary and secondary education and higher education. The councils shall present their annual budgets to the board for its review and approval. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall authorize the board to alter the allocation of grants or aid otherwise provided by law;

To develop and submit to the general assembly for approval a performance funding formula for public higher education that furthers the purposes of the board and ensures that all students may achieve educational excellence;

To develop policies that maximize the potential of collaboration from elementary and secondary education through higher education systems and that improve efficiencies at all levels of the education system through improved coordination of activities;

To embrace the legislative findings regarding virtual education established by §

16-22.1-2

and adopt goals and policies that address these findings and to encourage the council on elementary and secondary education and the council for postsecondary education to develop and or improve virtual learning experiences for Rhode Island students;

To approve the appointment of a commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

To approve the appointment of a commissioner of postsecondary education.

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified board members within six (6) months of their qualification. The course shall be developed by the chairperson of the board, approved by the board, and conducted by the chairperson of the board. The board may approve the use of any board or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and the board’s own rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 9.

16-97-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 10, effective June 19, 2014.

16-97-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 10, effective June 19, 2014.

16-97-4.
Change of former names.

Effective January 1, 2013, the term “Rhode Island Board of Education” shall be used in lieu of any then existing law reference made to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education and/or the board of governors for higher education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 3.

16-97-5.
Abolishment of boards.

The board of governors for higher education established in chapter 16-59 and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education established in chapter 16-60 shall cease to exist as of January 1, 2013.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 3.

16-97-6.
Reporting requirements.

The board shall submit an annual report to the governor, speaker of the house, senate president, chairs of the house and senate finance committees and their respective fiscal advisors, the chair of the house health, education and welfare committee, and chair of the senate education committee no later than March 1, 2015, and every March 1 thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 8; P.L. 2014, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 381, § 1.

16-97-7.
Tuition waivers — Disclosure as a prerequisite to receipt.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no employee of the state board of education, or the board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island, his or her spouse, domestic partner or dependent, shall receive a tuition waiver as a result of employment status with the state board of education, or the board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island without first consenting to the public disclosure of the existence and amount of the waiver. This section shall apply to any tuition waivers, including, but not limited to, any such waiver at the community college of Rhode Island, Rhode Island college, and/or the university of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 8.

16-97-8.
Assessment of student performance.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall implement the state assessment program. The program shall include performance standards and an annual report that disaggregates performance by race, poverty, native language, and gender.

Prior to the graduating class of 2017, no state assessment conducted pursuant to this chapter, and no other standardized testing program or assessment, shall be used to determine a student’s eligibility to graduate from high school. Any such assessments implemented prior to the graduating class of 2017 shall be used to promote school improvement and to target remediation programs to individual students and groups of students.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 336, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 337, § 3.

16-97-9.
Comprehensive study — Unified approach to statewide education.

The board of education, in conjunction with the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the commissioner of postsecondary education, shall undertake a comprehensive study of the alignment of the core curriculum used by the various school districts throughout the state with the goals and objectives of the state’s colleges and universities:

The main objective of the study shall be to determine a unified approach for education within and across the state that encompasses the education and development of workforce skills, of our youth and adult learners, from kindergarten through the graduation of college or the entrance into the workforce;

The study shall include, at a minimum, recommended policy objectives, implementation strategies, and a timetable for the implementation of the policies and the formulation of the rules and regulations necessary to achieve a unified approach and curriculum for schools under the authority of the council and in furtherance of the objectives of the state colleges and universities.

The board shall report its findings to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate no later than July 1, 2017.

The board of education shall base its timetable for implementation of the unified approach to education on the time necessary to promulgate rules and regulations with respect to the following policies:

Instituting a process for drawing up curriculum frameworks for the core subjects covered by the academic standards adopted by the board (common core state standards):

The curriculum frameworks shall:

Present approaches and strategies for assisting students in the development of the skills, competencies, and knowledge called for by these standards; and

Provide sufficient detail as to provide objective measures and standards to be met by students and to assist in the education, professional development, certification, and evaluation of both active and aspiring teachers;

The establishment of curriculum frameworks, and any further revisions, shall be open and consultative and take into consideration:

The knowledge and experiences of classroom teachers, school administrators, faculty of schools of education, parents, and any other persons with the knowledge and experience who may assist the committee in the furtherance of its objectives;

Other accepted curriculum frameworks, model curricula, content standards, attainment targets, courses of study, and instruction materials currently being used, or in the process of being implemented, in the United States;

Approaches being taken internationally that may be of assistance; and

The exploration of collaborative development efforts with other projects, including, but not limited to, the national New Standards Project;

The curriculum frameworks shall be constructed to guide and assist teachers, administrators, publishers, software developers, and other interested parties in the development and selection of curricula, textbooks, technology, and other instructional materials, and in the design of pedagogical approaches and techniques for elementary, secondary, and vocational-technical schools.

Develop a school-based management model that shall be submitted to the general assembly and the governor for consideration. The management model, at a minimum, shall include:

A process where the superintendent of a school system hires the principals for their schools and the principal of the selected school hires his or her teachers;

An appropriate level of educational opportunities for teachers and administrators to learn and continue to develop the skills and leadership qualities necessary to become effective administrators and principals;

The creation of a school council to assist in the management and to provide support to each public elementary, secondary, and independent vocational school utilizing the school-based management model; and

A recommended transition plan that provides guidance and support to local districts in implementing the school-based management model.

Establish a professional development plan for educational professionals within the k-12 system based upon the successful implementation of similar programs by other school systems/departments throughout the country and the most efficient way to implement similar practices in the state. In addition to continued professional development, any program offered by the board of education shall offer opportunities that encourage the development of leadership skills and the professional advancement of teachers to administrative positions.

Ensure that all students, regardless of residence or economic status, are provided an opportunity to succeed; and to develop, based on best practices, the system and processes necessary to support the early intervention and long-term development of children from low-income families to maintain learning skills and school success and improve their ability to compete in their chosen endeavor after exiting the secondary school system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 507, § 1.

16-97-10.
Closing the achievement gap.

The board of education and council on elementary and secondary education shall adopt a state goal of closing the achievement gaps in third-grade reading and third-grade math for all groups and subgroups of student population by fifty percent (50%) by school year 2020 and closure in its entirety by 2025. The board of education shall direct the council on postsecondary education, in conjunction with the Community College of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College and the University of Rhode Island, to develop strategies to increase the recruitment of minority teacher-preparation students in an effort to increase diversity in the teaching profession. The board of education, in conjunction with the department of elementary and secondary education and the office of the postsecondary commissioner, shall develop a plan and shall set state goals to close all achievement and opportunity gaps across the PK — 20 public system of education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 523, § 1.